Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska1-159
Corporation; use of terms; requirements.

No person shall sign or affix a corporate name with any wording indicating
that it is a corporation performing services as accountants or auditors or
composed of accountants or auditors or persons having expert knowledge in
accounting or auditing, to any accounting or financial statement, or to any
report on or certificate to any accounting or financial statement, except
that a corporation which is registered under section 1-134 and holds a permit
issued under subdivision (1)(c) of section 1-136 which
is not revoked or suspended may affix its corporate name with the
wording indicated above.

Laws 1957, c. 1, § 54, p. 75;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 49;

Laws 2009, LB31, § 31.